Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB550.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the BPA-free Container Products for Infants Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Container." A food or beverage container that serves as a package, parcel or other vessel intended for use in storing, heating or serving liquids or solids intended for consumption by infants."Infant." A child under one year of age.Section 3. Bisphenol A-free food and beverage containers for 12345678910111213141516 infants.(a) Prohibition.--A person may not manufacture, sell or distribute any container intended for use by infants that contains bisphenol A at a level above 0.1 parts per billion.(b) Manufacturer standard.--A manufacturer under this section:(1) Shall use the least toxic alternative when replacing bisphenol A in containers as provided under this section.(2) May not replace bisphenol A with carcinogens rated by the Environmental Protection Agency as A, B or C carcinogens or substances listed as known or likely carcinogens, known to be human carcinogens, likely to be human carcinogens or suggestive of being human carcinogens, as described by the Environmental Protection Agency in the Integrated Risk Information System.(3) May not replace bisphenol A with reproductive toxicants that cause birth defects, reproductive harm or developmental harm, as identified by the Environmental Protection Agency.Section 4. Violation of Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law.A violation of section 3 constitutes unfair methods of competition and unfair or deceptive acts or practices within the meaning of section 2(4) of the act of December 17, 1968 (P.L.1224, No.387), known as the Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law, and shall be subject to the enforcement provisions, civil penalties and private rights of action contained in that act.Section 5. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0550PN0551 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930